src/sje-lex.txt
LEXICON V_CONTR
+V+Inf:%>t # ; 
+V+PrfPrc:%>m #;

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>jin #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>behten #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>ba #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>p #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>bihtit #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ji #;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>jiv #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>ji #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmen #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jden #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>jga #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>jin #;


LEXICON BALLAT_S
+Inf:%>at # ; 
+GerII:%>amin # ;
+PrfPrc:%>am # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>á #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>in #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>abehtin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>aba #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>ap #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>abihtit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>i #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>iv #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>in #; 

LEXICON BALLAT_W
+GerI:%>adin # ; 
+VAdv:%>a # ;
+Sup:%>atjit # ;
+Vabe:%>ahk # ;

    
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>av #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>a #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>aj #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>ajmen #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>ajden #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>ajga #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>ajme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>ajde #;




LEXICON NAMMADIT
+V+Inf:%>it # ;
+V+Ind+Prs: V_ODD_IND_PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt: V_ODD_IND_PRT ;

LEXICON V_ODD_IND_PRS
+Sg1:%>av # ; 
+Sg2:%>a # ; 
+Sg3: # ; !oregelbunden
+Sg3:%>a # ; 
+Du1:%>in # ; 
+Du2:%>ihpen # ; 
+Du3:%>ebá # ; 
+Pl1:%>ip # ; 
+Pl2:%>ihpit # ; 
+Pl3:%>i # ; 

LEXICON V_ODD_IND_PRT
+Sg1:%>iv # ; 
+Sg2:%>i # ; 
+Sg3:%>ij # ; 
+Du1:%>ijmen # ; 
+Du2:%>ijden # ; 
+Du3:%>ijga # ; 
+Pl1:%>ijme # ; 
+Pl2:%>ijde # ; 
+Pl3:%>in # ; 
 
 











LEXICON K
# ;
! +Qst:go # ; ! Dummy clitic only!


LEXICON ENDLEX
   @D.NeedNoun.ON@ # ;
	
